Hawaii, session 2025, GM1217.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Chapter 356D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to part II to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
"§356D- Disposition of abandoned or seized property.
(a) The authority may sell, donate, or otherwise dispose of
property abandoned or seized in or around any federal public
housing project upon compliance with the requirements of this
section.
(b) The authority shall send notice by certified mail, at
least five calendar days before disposition of the abandoned or
seized property, to the address of the owner of the property
abandoned or seized if the owner is known or can be determined.
The notice shall apprise the owner of the identity and location
of the property abandoned or seized and of the intent of the
authority to sell, donate, or otherwise dispose of the property.
If the identity or the address of the owner is unknown or cannot
2025-2755 SB1413 CDl SMA.docx
iHiiiittiiniiiiintiiiiiiii

Page 2
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
be determined, the notice shall be posted on the premises on
which the property was abandoned or seized.
(c) If the abandoned or seized property has an estimated
value of $500 or more per item, as estimated at the discretion
of the authority, the authority shall give public notice of the
disposition at least once statewide or in a publication of local
circulation in the county in which the property was abandoned or
seized; provided that the disposition shall not take place fewer
than five days after the publication date of the notice of
Intent to sell, donate, or otherwise dispose of the property.
(d) The sale of abandoned or seized property having an
estimated value of $500 or more per item, as estimated at the
discretion of the authority, shall be by public auction through
oral offers in the county in which the property was abandoned or
seized. If no bid is received, the property may be sold,
donated, or otherwise disposed of as the authority deems
appropriate.
(e) Any person entitled to the abandoned or seized
property may repossess the property before its disposition upon
proof of entitlement and payment of all unpaid rent, debtg,
charges, and fines owed to the authority and all handling,
2025-2755 SB1413 CDl SMA.docx :
iHiiiiimiiiiiiiniliiliii

Page 3
SB. NO. E
C.D. 1
storage, appraisal, advertising, and other expenses incurred in
connection with the proposed disposition of the abandoned or
seized property; provided that storage fees shall be not less
than $25 per day.
(f) The requirement of public notice and public auction
pursuant to subsections (c) and (d) shall not apply when the
value of the abandoned or seized property is less than $500 per
item. The property may be sold, donated, or otherwise disposed
of as the authority deems appropriate.
(g) The proceeds of the sale of abandoned or seized
property, after deduction of all unpaid rent, debts, charges,
and fines owed to the authority, and all expenses of handling,
storge, appraisal, advertising, and other expenses, shall be
first offset against any amounts owed by the owner to the State.
Any amount remaining shall be held in trust for the owner of the
property for thirty days, after which time the proceeds shall be
paid into the authority's appropriate special fund.
(h) The State and its officers, employees, and agents
shall not be liable to the owner of abandoned or seized property
for actions taken pursuant to this section."
SECTION 2. New statutory material is underscored.
2025-2755 SB1413 CDl SMA.docx 3

Page 4
S B. NO.
C.D. 1
SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-2755 SB1413 CDl SMA.docx

iwiiimiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiHiiii

S.B. NO. s-
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 29th day of May ,2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 1413, S.D. 1, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.


SB No. 1413, SD 1,HD2,CD1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date; April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives